Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-8] Acquisition, use, and disposition
of property. (a) The authority may acquire any real or personal property
or interest therein by purchase, exchange, gift, grant, lease, or other means
from any person or government to provide public housing. Exchange of real
property shall be in accordance with section 171-50.

(b) The authority may own or hold real
property. All real property owned or held by the authority shall be exempt
from mechanics' or materialmen's liens and also from levy and sale by virtue of
an execution, and no execution or other judicial process shall issue against
the property of the authority nor shall any judgment against the authority be a
charge or lien upon its real property; provided that this subsection shall not
apply to nor limit the right of obligees to foreclose or otherwise enforce any
mortgage of the authority or the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for
the enforcement of any pledge or lien given by the authority on its rents,
fees, or revenues. The authority and its property shall be exempt from all
taxes and assessments.

(c) The authority may lease or rent all or a
portion of any public housing project and establish and revise the rents or
charges therefor. The authority may sell, exchange, transfer, assign, or
pledge any property, real or personal, or any interest therein to any person or
government.

(d) The authority may insure or provide for
the insurance of its property or operations against risks as it deems
advisable. [L 2006, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next